sl-SI: Stil obeska za ključe: Obesek z odpiračem za steklenice; Obesek z vponko; Okrasni/viseči obesek; Figurica; Obesek s svetilko; Trak za okrog vratu (lanyard); Obesek z večnamenskim orodjem; Plišasti; Oblika ploščka/krogle; Ploščica/oznaka; Obesek s piščalko; Obesek za okrog zapestja; Drugo
en: Keychain style: Bottle opener keychain; Carabiner keychain; Charm/dangle; Figurine; Flashlight keychain; Lanyard strap; Multi-tool keychain; Plush; Puck/ball shaped; Tag/plate; Whistle keychain; Wristlet keychain; Other
da: Nøgleringstil: Nøglering med oplukker; Nøglering med karabinhage; Vedhæng; Figur; Nøglering med lygte; Nøglesnor; Nøglering med multiværktøj; Plys; Puck-/boldformet; Mærkat/plade; Nøglering med fløjte; Nøglering med håndledsstrop; Andet
ja: キーホルダースタイル: 栓抜きキーホルダー; カラビナキーホルダー; チャーム/ダングル; フィギュア; フラッシュライトキーホルダー; ランヤードストラップ; マルチツールキーホルダー; ぬいぐるみ; パック/ボール型; タグ/プレート; ホイッスルキーホルダー; リストレットキーホルダー; その他
ru: Стиль брелока: Брелок-открывалка для бутылок; Брелок-карабин; Подвеска; Фигурка; Брелок-фонарик; Ремешок-ланъярд; Брелок-мультитул; Плюшевый; В форме шайбы/мяча; Бирка/пластинка; Брелок-свисток; Брелок-браслет; Другое
pt-PT: Estilo do porta-chaves: Porta-chaves com abridor de garrafas; Porta-chaves com mosquetão; Berloque/pendente; Estatueta; Porta-chaves com lanterna; Fita lanyard; Porta-chaves multiusos; Pelúcia; Em forma de disco/bola; Etiqueta/placa; Porta-chaves com apito; Porta-chaves de pulso; Outro
pl: Styl breloka: Brelok z otwieraczem do butelek; Brelok z karabińczykiem; Zawieszka/wisior; Figurka; Brelok z latarką; Pasek ze smyczą; Brelok z narzędziem wielofunkcyjnym; Pluszowy; W kształcie krążka/kuli; Przywieszka/plakietka; Brelok z gwizdkiem; Brelok na nadgarstek; Inny
es: Estilo de llavero: Llavero abrebotellas; Llavero mosquetón; Dije/colgante; Figura; Llavero linterna; Correa para el cuello; Llavero multiherramienta; Peluche; Forma de disco/pelota; Etiqueta/placa; Llavero silbato; Llavero de pulsera; Otro
zh-TW: 鑰匙圈款式: 開瓶器鑰匙圈; 登山扣鑰匙圈; 吊飾; 公仔; 手電筒鑰匙圈; 頸繩/掛繩; 多功能工具鑰匙圈; 絨毛玩具; 圓盤/球型; 標籤/名牌; 哨子鑰匙圈; 手腕帶鑰匙圈; 其他
lt-LT: Raktų pakabuko stilius: Raktų pakabukas-atidarytuvas; Raktų pakabukas su karabinu; Pakabukas / amuletas; Figūrėlė; Raktų pakabukas-žibintuvėlis; Juostelė ant kaklo; Daugiafunkcis raktų pakabukas; Pliušinis; Ritulio / kamuoliuko formos; Žymeklis / plokštelė; Raktų pakabukas-švilpukas; Raktų pakabukas ant riešo; Kita
th: พวงกุญแจ: พวงกุญแจที่เปิดขวด; พวงกุญแจคาราบิเนอร์; จี้/ที่ห้อย; ฟิกเกอร์จิ๋ว; พวงกุญแจไฟฉาย; สายคล้องคอ/สายคล้อง; พวงกุญแจอุปกรณ์อเนกประสงค์; ตุ๊กตาผ้าขน; รูปทรงลูกพัค/ลูกบอล; ป้ายแท็ก/แผ่นป้าย; พวงกุญแจนกหวีด; พวงกุญแจสายคล้องข้อมือ; อื่นๆ
el: Στυλ μπρελόκ: Μπρελόκ ανοιχτήρι; Μπρελόκ κρίκος (καραμπίνερ); Μενταγιόν/Κρεμαστό; Φιγούρα; Μπρελόκ φακός; Ιμάντας λαιμού; Μπρελόκ πολυεργαλείο; Λούτρινο; Σχήμα δίσκου/μπάλας; Ετικέτα/Ταμπελάκι; Μπρελόκ σφυρίχτρα; Μπρελόκ καρπού; Άλλο
fi: Avaimenperän tyyli: Pullonavaaja-avaimenperä; Karabiiniavaimenperä; Koriste/riipus; Hahmo; Taskulamppuavaimenperä; Kaulanauha; Monitoimiavaimenperä; Pehmo; Kiekon tai pallon muotoinen; Tunniste/laatta; Pilli-avaimenperä; Ranneke-avaimenperä; Muu
hu: Kulcstartó stílusa: Sörnyitós kulcstartó; Karabineres kulcstartó; Függő / fityegő; Figura; Zseblámpás kulcstartó; Nyakpántos kulcstartó; Multitool kulcstartó; Plüss; Korong/gömb alakú; Címke/tábla; Sípos kulcstartó; Csuklópántos kulcstartó; Egyéb
zh-CN: 钥匙扣样式: 开瓶器钥匙扣; 登山扣钥匙扣; 吊饰/挂坠; 公仔; 手电筒钥匙扣; 挂绳挂带; 多功能工具钥匙扣; 毛绒; 冰球/球形; 吊牌/铭牌; 口哨钥匙扣; 腕带钥匙扣; 其他
fr: Forme du porte-clés: Porte-clés décapsuleur; Porte-clés mousqueton; Breloque/pendentif; Figurine; Porte-clés lampe de poche; Lanière; Porte-clés multifonction; Peluche; En forme de palet/boule; Étiquette/plaque; Porte-clés sifflet; Porte-clés bracelet; Autre
vi: Kiểu móc khóa: Móc khóa mở nắp chai; Móc khóa carabiner; Mặt charm/treo; Bức tượng nhỏ; Móc khóa có đèn pin; Dây đeo cổ/tay; Móc khóa đa năng; Nhồi bông; Dạng bóng/đĩa; Dạng thẻ/bảng; Móc khóa còi; Móc khóa đeo cổ tay; Khác
ro-RO: Stil breloc: Breloc cu desfăcător de sticle; Breloc tip carabinieră; Breloc cu talisman/pandantiv; Figurină; Breloc cu lanternă; Șnur; Breloc cu instrument multifuncțional; Pluș; Formă de puc/bilă; Etichetă/plăcuță; Breloc cu fluier; Breloc tip brățară; Altele
pt-BR: Chaveiro estilo: Chaveiro abridor de garrafas; Chaveiro mosquetão; Pingente; Estatueta; Chaveiro lanterna; Cordão de pescoço; Chaveiro multiferramenta; Pelúcia; Formato de disco/bola; Etiqueta/placa; Chaveiro apito; Chaveiro de pulso; Outro
ko: 열쇠고리 스타일: 병따개 키체인; 카라비너 키체인; 참/댕글; 피규어; 손전등 키체인; 랜야드 스트랩; 멀티툴 키체인; 플러시; 퍽/공 모양; 태그/플레이트; 호루라기 키체인; 팔찌형 키체인; 기타
cs: Styl klíčenky: Klíčenka s otvírákem na lahve; Klíčenka s karabinou; Přívěsek; Figurka; Klíčenka se svítilnou; Šňůrka na krk; Klíčenka s multifunkčním nástrojem; Plyšová; Ve tvaru puku/míčku; Štítek/destička; Klíčenka s píšťalkou; Klíčenka na zápěstí; Jiné
nb: Nøkkelringens stil: Nøkkelring med flaskeåpner; Karabinkrok-nøkkelring; Anheng; Figur; Nøkkelring med lommelykt; Nøkkelbånd; Nøkkelring med multiverktøy; Plysj; Puck-/kuleformet; Brikke/plate; Nøkkelring med fløyte; Nøkkelring for håndledd; Annet
sk-SK: Štýl kľúčenky: Kľúčenka s otváračom na fľaše; Kľúčenka s karabínou; Prívesok/ozdoba; Figúrka; Kľúčenka so svietidlom; Šnúrka na krk; Kľúčenka s multifunkčným nástrojom; Plyš; V tvare puku/loptičky; Štítok/doštička; Kľúčenka s píšťalkou; Kľúčenka na zápästie; Iné
de: Stil des Schlüsselanhängers: Flaschenöffner-Schlüsselanhänger; Karabiner-Schlüsselanhänger; Charm/Anhänger; Figur; Taschenlampen-Schlüsselanhänger; Schlüsselband/Lanyard; Multitool-Schlüsselanhänger; Plüsch; Puck-/Ballform; Schild/Plakette; Trillerpfeifen-Schlüsselanhänger; Armband-Schlüsselanhänger; Sonstige
sv: Nyckelringsstil: Nyckelring med flasköppnare; Nyckelring med karbinhake; Berlock/hängsmycke; Figurin; Nyckelring med ficklampa; Nyckelband; Nyckelring med multiverktyg; Plysch; Puck-/bollformad; Bricka/platta; Nyckelring med visselpipa; Nyckelring med handledsrem; Övrigt
nl: Sleutelhanger stijl: Flessenopener-sleutelhanger; Karabijnhaak-sleutelhanger; Bedeltje/hanger; Beeldje; Zaklamp-sleutelhanger; Keykoord; Multitool-sleutelhanger; Pluche; Puck-/balvormig; Label/plaatje; Fluitje-sleutelhanger; Polsband-sleutelhanger; Anders
it: Stile del portachiavi: Portachiavi apribottiglie; Portachiavi con moschettone; Ciondolo/pendente; Statuina; Portachiavi con torcia; Cinturino tipo cordino; Portachiavi multiuso; Peluche; A forma di disco/palla; Targhetta/piastrina; Portachiavi con fischietto; Portachiavi da polso; Altro
hr-HR: Stil privjeska za ključeve: Privjesak otvarač za boce; Privjesak s karabinerom; Viseći privjesak; Figurica; Privjesak svjetiljka; Vrpca za vrat; Višenamjenski privjesak; Plišani; U obliku paka/loptice; Oznaka/pločica; Privjesak zviždaljka; Privjesak za zglob; Ostalo
bg-BG: Стил на ключодържателя: Ключодържател с отварачка; Ключодържател тип карабинер; Талисман/висулка; Фигурка; Ключодържател с фенерче; Лента за врат; Ключодържател тип мултитул; Плюшен; С форма на шайба/топка; Етикет/табелка; Ключодържател със свирка; Ключодържател за китка; Друго
tr: Anahtarlık stili: Şişe açacaklı anahtarlık; Karabinalı anahtarlık; Sallantılı/süs; Figür; El fenerli anahtarlık; Boyun askısı; Çoklu aletli anahtarlık; Pelüş; Disk/top şeklinde; Etiket/plaka; Düdüklü anahtarlık; Bilek askılı anahtarlık; Diğer